Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 201819-5309
Conflict of interest.

(1) No member of an authority or employee of an authority shall acquire any interest, direct or indirect, in real property located within the boundaries of any district overseen and managed by the authority.

(2) No member of an authority or employee of an authority shall have any interest, direct or indirect, in any contract or proposed contract for materials or services to be furnished or used by the authority.

Laws 2017, LB97, § 9.